Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska9-1102
Games of chance; permitted; restrictions.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, and to the full extent permitted by the Constitution of Nebraska, including amendments to the Constitution of Nebraska adopted contemporaneously with the enactment of the Nebraska Racetrack Gaming Act, the operation of games of chance is permitted only by authorized gaming operators within licensed racetrack enclosures as provided in the act.

Initiative Law 2020, No. 430, § 2.